Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 9.1 Equal Rights to Public Facilities

40-9.1-1.
Declaration of policy.

It is the policy of this state that:

Persons who are blind, visually impaired, deaf, hard-of-hearing or otherwise have a disability have the same rights as the able-bodied to the full and free use of the streets, highways, walkways, public buildings, public facilities, and other public places.

Persons who are blind, visually impaired, deaf, hard-of-hearing or otherwise have a disability are entitled to full and equal accommodations, advantages, facilities, and privileges on any public conveyance operated on land or water or in the air, or any stations and terminals thereof, not limited to taxis, airplanes, motor vehicles, railroad trains, motor buses, street cars, boats; and in any educational institution, not limited to any kindergarten, primary and secondary school, trade or business school, high school, academy, college and university; and in places of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement, not limited to hotels, lodging places, restaurants, theater; and in all other places to which the general public is invited, subject only to the conditions and limitations established by law and applicable alike to all persons.

[Deleted by P.L. 2019, ch. 96, § 1 and P.L. 2019, ch. 131, § 1.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 55, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 159, § 6; P.L. 1997, ch. 85, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 96, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 131, § 1.

40-9.1-1.1.
Definitions.

“Disability” means a disability as defined in §

42-87-1

.

“Guide dog” means a dog that has been, or is being, specially trained to aid a particular blind or visually impaired person.

“Hearing dog” means a dog that has been, or is being, specially trained to aid a particular deaf or hard-of-hearing person.

“Public area” means a part of a place listed in §

40-9.1-1

that is open to the general public.

“Regular hours” means the hours of any day in which a public place listed in §

40-9.1-1

is open to members of the general public.

“Service animal” means a dog that has been, or is being, specifically trained to assist an individual with a disability, and includes a guide dog or hearing dog.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 85, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 22; P.L. 2009, ch. 96, § 5; P.L. 2009, ch. 97, § 5; P.L. 2012, ch. 90, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 96, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 131, § 1.

40-9.1-2.
Service animals in public places.

Every person with a disability has the right to be accompanied by a service animal, specially trained for that person, in any place listed in §

40-9.1-1

without being required to pay an extra charge for the personal assistance animal. Each person with a disability using a service animal is solely liable for any damage done to persons, premises, or facilities by the service animal.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 55, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 159, § 7; P.L. 1997, ch. 85, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 96, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 131, § 1.

40-9.1-2.1.
Trainers of service animals.

Every trainer or puppy raiser of a service animal shall have the same rights and privileges as stated in §

40-9.1-2

for every person with a disability. Each trainer or puppy raiser during the training of a service animal is liable for any damage done to persons, premises, or facilities by that service animal.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 85, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 96, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 131, § 1.

40-9.1-3.
Penalty for injuring or interfering with a service animal — Civil actions — Damages — Costs and attorney’s fees.

It is unlawful for any person, corporation, or the agent of any corporation to:

Withhold, deny, deprive, or attempt to withhold, deny, or deprive, any other person of any right or privilege secured by §§

40-9.1-2

and

40-9.1-2.1

;

Intimidate, threaten, coerce, or attempt to threaten, intimidate, or coerce, any other person to interfere with any right or privilege secured by §§

40-9.1-2

and

40-9.1-2.1

;

Punish, or attempt to punish, any person for exercising, or attempting to exercise, any right or privilege secured by §§ 40-9.1-2 and 40-9.1-2.1.

It is unlawful for any person to injure a service animal and the person shall be liable for the injuries to the service animal, and if necessary the replacement and compensation for the loss of the service animal.

It is unlawful for the owner of an animal to allow their animal to injure a service animal because the owner failed to control or leash the animal. The owner shall also be liable for the injuries to the service animal, and if necessary the replacement and compensation for the loss of the service animal.

Any person who violates subsection (a)(1) is guilty of a misdemeanor. Any person who purposely or negligently violates subsection (a)(2) or (a)(3) is guilty of a misdemeanor. Violations shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months or by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100), or by both fine and imprisonment. Any person or corporation who or that violates subsection (a), (b), or (c) is also liable to the person whose rights under §§

40-9.1-2

and

40-9.1-2.1

were violated for actual damages for any economic loss and/or punitive damages, to be recovered by a civil action in a court in, and for the county in, which the infringement of civil rights occurred or in which the defendant lives.

In an action brought under this section, the court shall award costs and reasonable attorney’s fees to the prevailing party.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 55, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 179, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 85, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 96, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 131, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 33.

40-9.1-3.1.
Misrepresentation of service animal.

It is a violation of this chapter for an individual to take an animal into a public area where pets are not permitted, and state that the animal is a service animal entitled to be present, if the animal is not a service animal.

Businesses may post a decal suitable in a front window or door, stating that service animals are welcome and that misrepresentation of a service animal is a violation of Rhode Island law.

It shall be a violation for any individual to misrepresent a pet or any other animal as a service animal when attempting to gain access to or remain in a public area. A violation of this section occurs when:

An individual expressly represents that an animal in his or her possession is a service animal for the purpose of obtaining any rights or privileges afforded to persons with disabilities accompanied by service animals, but unavailable to people and their pets or other animals; and

The individual knew or should have known that the animal in question did not meet the definition of a service animal.

A violation of this section shall be deemed a civil violation, punishable by up to thirty (30) hours of community service for an organization that serves individuals with disabilities at the discretion of the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 96, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 131, § 2.

40-9.1-4.
Enforcement of anti-discrimination provisions.

The Rhode Island commission for human rights is empowered and directed, as hereinafter provided, to prevent any person from violating any of the provisions of this chapter; provided, that before instituting a formal hearing, it shall attempt by informal methods of conference, persuasion, and conciliation, to induce compliance with those sections. Upon the commission’s own initiative, or whenever an aggrieved individual or an organization chartered for the purpose of combating discrimination or of safeguarding civil liberties or rights of persons with disabilities, such individual or organization being hereinafter referred to as “the complainant,” makes a charge to the commission that any person, agency, bureau, corporation, or association, hereinafter referred to as “the respondent,” has violated, or is violating, any of the provisions of this chapter, the commission may proceed in the same manner and with the same powers as provided in §§

28-5-16

—

28-5-27

, and the provisions of §§

28-5-13

and

28-5-16

—

28-5-36

, as to the powers, duties, and rights of the commission, its members, hearing examiners, the complainant, respondent, interviewer, and the court shall apply in any proceedings under this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 85, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 100; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 100.

40-9.1-5.
Therapy pets in public places.

The privileges of access and transportation provided to service animals in §

40-9.1-2

shall be extended to family therapy pets, which are further defined as primary companions which include, but are not limited to, dogs, cats, rabbits, and guinea pigs, that are working in the provision of pet-assisted therapy treatment and education.

The provisions are such that the pet-assisted therapy facilitator is working in conjunction with the therapy pet in a predetermined medical or educational setting, with a selected clientele. The medical interactions are to be individually planned, goal-oriented, and treatment based, and the educational settings are to be classroom based.

Throughout the interactions, the pet-assisted therapy facilitator and the therapy pet will abide by a set code of ethics, and will follow professional guidelines to ensure that the actions and deeds of the pet-assisted therapy facilitator reflect advocacy of profession, pets, and clients, and other professions; while simultaneously ensuring that the interaction of the therapy pet and client remains beneficial and strives to enhance the quality of life through this animal-human bond.

Prior to any interactions, the therapy pet must first meet the immunization criteria, a current certificate of good health, which shall be issued by a licensed, practicing veterinarian; as well as the temperament criteria, a certificate of good temperament, which shall be issued from a certified or practicing dog trainer or animal behaviorist; and training criteria, in which the pet-assisted therapy facilitator and the therapy pet learn to work as a team, learning together to execute safe and effective interaction, which are accepted in the field, specifically other pet-assisted animal facilitators, veterinarians, dog trainers, animal behaviorists, and the state of Rhode Island.

Access and transportation privileges are only extended while the therapy pet is on the way to, or actively participating in, a program.

The animal-assisted therapy facilitator, an individual who has successfully completed, or is in the process of completing, an accepted pet-assisted therapy program, shall be responsible for the control and safety of the pet, which is to include: cleaning up and elimination of wastes; keeping the pet on a proper leash and collar; carrying a smaller animal in a travel crate; adhering to all standard rules, regulations, and laws within both the facility and the state of Rhode Island; and upholding an active insurance policy that will cover an unforeseen mishap and/or accidental occurrence that may result in causing property damage and/or personal injury while actively participating in a program.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 451, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 22; P.L. 2019, ch. 96, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 131, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 33.

40-9.1-6.
Closed-captioning activation required.

On request, a place of public accommodation shall keep closed-captioning activated on any closed-captioning television receiver that is in use during regular hours in any public area.

This section does not require a place of public accommodation to make closed-captioning available in a public area at the place of public accommodation if:

No television receiver of any kind is available in the public area; or

The only public television receiver available in the public area is not a closed-captioning television receiver.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 90, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 100, § 2.

40-9.1-7.
Non-interference with federal law.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to interfere with any rights provided by federal law to individuals with disabilities.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 96, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 131, § 2.